Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6236.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 4l. (1) The manual control of an automated door that is installed in a public facility must use a push plate that is blue and contains the international symbol of access in a contrasting color. (2) This section applies to an automated door that a person installs on or after the effective date of this act. (3) As used in this section: (a) "Automated door" means a power-assisted door that requires activation by a user through a manual control that uses a push plate. Automated door does not include a power-assisted door that requires activation by a user through any other manual control than a push plate. (b) "Public facility" means that term as defined in section 1 of 1966 PA 1, MCL 125.1351.